Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.01
Delayed Birth Registration Act, how cited.

Sections 71-617.01 to 71-617.15 shall be known and may be cited as the Delayed Birth Registration Act.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 8.